Arkansas, session 2025, SB528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-30-102(a), concerning the powers and
duties of the Office of Skills Development and the Career Education and
Workforce Development Board, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(13) Ensure that a public high school, a postsecondary technical
institute, a two-year college, or an education service cooperative that has
been approved by the Career Education and Workforce Development Board as a
secondary technical center begins operation with at least six (6) occupation
specific programs.



*CRH271*
03/19/2025 5:12:52 PM CRH271